Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 92.
[REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF ADMINISTRATIVE RULES] (CONST., ART. 5, § 42, ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment added Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 42. The amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 7 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the 2014 general election by a vote of 469,431 for and 325,396 against. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.